Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.100

Ex officio treasurer.

The treasurer of the county in which a public facilities district is located must be the ex officio treasurer of the district, unless the board of directors of a public facilities district created in a county of one million five hundred thousand or more designates by resolution another person having experience in financial or fiscal matters as the treasurer of the district. Such a treasurer possesses all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties of, and is subject to the same restrictions as provided by law for, a county treasurer with regard to district financial matters. Such treasurer must be bonded for not less than twenty-five thousand dollars.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 7; 1995 c 396 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Construction—2010 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 36.100.010.

Severability—1995 c 396: See note following RCW 36.100.010.